Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-532
Village board of trustees; terms; qualifications.

The members of a village board of trustees shall be elected at the statewide general election as provided in section 17-202 and each four years thereafter. Except as provided in such section, the term of each board member shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The board members shall meet the qualifications found in section 17-203.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 128;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 7.